Illinois, session 104th, SB134.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Estate and Generation-Skipping 5Transfer Tax Act is amended by changing Section 2 as follows: 6    (35 ILCS 405/2)  (from Ch. 120, par. 405A-2)7    Sec. 2. Definitions. 8    "Federal estate tax" means the tax due to the United 9States with respect to a taxable transfer under Chapter 11 of 10the Internal Revenue Code.11    "Federal generation-skipping transfer tax" means the tax 12due to the United States with respect to a taxable transfer 13under Chapter 13 of the Internal Revenue Code.14    "Federal return" means the federal estate tax return with 15respect to the federal estate tax and means the federal 16generation-skipping transfer tax return with respect to the 17federal generation-skipping transfer tax.18    "Federal transfer tax" means the federal estate tax or the 19federal generation-skipping transfer tax.20    "Illinois deceased spousal exclusion amount" means the 21difference between (i) the applicable exclusion amount for the 22deceased spouse under this Act on the date of the deceased 23spouse's death and (ii) the amount with respect to which the   SB0134- 2 -LRB104 06146 HLH 16180 b1tentative tax was determined under Section 2001 of the 2Internal Revenue Code on the estate of the deceased spouse. In 3no event may the Illinois deceased spousal exclusion amount be 4less than zero. 5    "Illinois estate tax" means the tax due to this State with 6respect to a taxable transfer.7    "Illinois generation-skipping transfer tax" means the tax 8due to this State with respect to a taxable transfer that gives 9rise to a federal generation-skipping transfer tax.10    "Illinois transfer tax" means the Illinois estate tax or 11the Illinois generation-skipping transfer tax.12    "Internal Revenue Code" means, unless otherwise provided, 13the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended from time to 14time.15    "Non-resident trust" means a trust that is not a resident 16of this State for purposes of the Illinois Income Tax Act, as 17amended from time to time.18    "Person" means and includes any individual, trust, estate, 19partnership, association, company or corporation.20    "Qualified heir" means a qualified heir as defined in 21Section 2032A(e)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code.22    "Resident trust" means a trust that is a resident of this 23State for purposes of the Illinois Income Tax Act, as amended 24from time to time.25    "State" means any state, territory or possession of the 26United States and the District of Columbia.  SB0134- 3 -LRB104 06146 HLH 16180 b1    "State tax credit" means:2    (a) For persons dying on or after January 1, 2003 and 3through December 31, 2005, an amount equal to the full credit 4calculable under Section 2011 or Section 2604 of the Internal 5Revenue Code as the credit would have been computed and 6allowed under the Internal Revenue Code as in effect on 7December 31, 2001, without the reduction in the State Death 8Tax Credit as provided in Section 2011(b)(2) or the 9termination of the State Death Tax Credit as provided in 10Section 2011(f) as enacted by the Economic Growth and Tax 11Relief Reconciliation Act of 2001, but recognizing the 12increased applicable exclusion amount through December 31, 132005.14    (b) For persons dying after December 31, 2005 and on or 15before December 31, 2009, and for persons dying after December 1631, 2010, an amount equal to the full credit calculable under 17Section 2011 or 2604 of the Internal Revenue Code as the credit 18would have been computed and allowed under the Internal 19Revenue Code as in effect on December 31, 2001, without the 20reduction in the State Death Tax Credit as provided in Section 212011(b)(2) or the termination of the State Death Tax Credit as 22provided in Section 2011(f) as enacted by the Economic Growth 23and Tax Relief Reconciliation Act of 2001, but with the 24following modifications: 25        (1) the exclusion amount shall be: recognizing the 26    exclusion amount of only (i)   SB0134- 4 -LRB104 06146 HLH 16180 b1            (A) $2,000,000 for persons dying prior to January 2        1, 2012; , 3            (B) (ii) $3,500,000 for persons dying on or after 4        January 1, 2012 and prior to January 1, 2013; , and5            (C) (iii) $4,000,000 for persons dying on or after 6        January 1, 2013, plus, for persons dying on or after 7        January 1, 2026, any Illinois deceased spousal 8        exclusion amount allowed under paragraph (2); , and 9        (2) for persons dying on or after January 1, 2026, if a 10    valid election has been made under subparagraph (A) of 11    paragraph (5) of subsection (c) of Section 2010 of the 12    Internal Revenue Code allowing the person to take into 13    account a federal deceased spousal unused exclusion amount 14    for the purposes of calculating the person's federal 15    estate tax, then the exclusion amount under paragraph (1) 16    shall include the Illinois deceased spousal unused 17    exclusion amount for the deceased spouse with respect to 18    whom the federal election was made; and 19        (3) the State tax credit shall be calculated with a 20    reduction to the adjusted taxable estate for any qualified 21    terminable interest property election as defined in 22    subsection (b-1) of this Section.23    (b-1) The person required to file the Illinois return may 24elect on a timely filed Illinois return a marital deduction 25for qualified terminable interest property under Section 262056(b)(7) of the Internal Revenue Code for purposes of the   SB0134- 5 -LRB104 06146 HLH 16180 b1Illinois estate tax that is separate and independent of any 2qualified terminable interest property election for federal 3estate tax purposes. For purposes of the Illinois estate tax, 4the inclusion of property in the gross estate of a surviving 5spouse is the same as under Section 2044 of the Internal 6Revenue Code. 7    In the case of any trust for which a State or federal 8qualified terminable interest property election is made, the 9trustee may not retain non-income producing assets for more 10than a reasonable amount of time without the consent of the 11surviving spouse. 12    "Taxable transfer" means an event that gives rise to a 13state tax credit, including any credit as a result of the 14imposition of an additional tax under Section 2032A(c) of the 15Internal Revenue Code.16    "Transferee" means a transferee within the meaning of 17Section 2603(a)(1) and Section 6901(h) of the Internal Revenue 18Code.19    "Transferred property" means: 20        (1) With respect to a taxable transfer occurring at 21    the death of an individual, the deceased individual's 22    gross estate as defined in Section 2031 of the Internal 23    Revenue Code. 24        (2) With respect to a taxable transfer occurring as a 25    result of a taxable termination as defined in Section 26    2612(a) of the Internal Revenue Code, the taxable amount   SB0134- 6 -LRB104 06146 HLH 16180 b1    determined under Section 2622(a) of the Internal Revenue 2    Code. 3        (3) With respect to a taxable transfer occurring as a 4    result of a taxable distribution as defined in Section 5    2612(b) of the Internal Revenue Code, the taxable amount 6    determined under Section 2621(a) of the Internal Revenue 7    Code. 8        (4) With respect to an event which causes the 9    imposition of an additional estate tax under Section 10    2032A(c) of the Internal Revenue Code, the qualified real 11    property that was disposed of or which ceased to be used 12    for the qualified use, within the meaning of Section 13    2032A(c)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code.14    "Trust" includes a trust as defined in Section 2652(b)(1) 15of the Internal Revenue Code.16(Source: P.A. 96-789, eff. 9-8-09; 96-1496, eff. 1-13-11; 1797-636, eff. 6-1-12.) 18    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 19becoming law.